North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 28. Interstate Compact on Juveniles.

§§ 7B-2800 through 7B-2827.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-194, s. 2. See editor’s note.

History.

G.S. 7B-2800

; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2801; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2802; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2803; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2804; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; c. 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-144, s. 25. G.S. 7B-2805; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-144, s. 26. G.S. 7B-2806; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2807; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2808; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2809; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2810; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2811; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2812; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2813; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2814; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2815; 1963, c. 910, s. 1; 1965, c. 925, s. 1; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2816; 1963, c. 910, s. 2; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2817; 1963, c. 910, s. 3; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2818; 1963, c. 910, s. 4; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2819; 1963, c. 910, s. 5; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-282020; 1963, c. 910, s. 6; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2821; 1965, c. 925, s. 2; 1971, c. 1231, s. 2; 1977, c. 552; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2822; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2823; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2824; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2825; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2826; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6. G.S. 7B-2827; 1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6.

Cross References.

For compact with states that have adopted the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, see Article 40 of this Chapter,

G.S. 7B-4000

et seq.